Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-212
Public library; use and purpose.

Except as provided in section 51-211, every library and reading room supported by public tax shall be forever free to the use of the inhabitants of the city, village, county, or township maintaining such library, subject always to such reasonable regulations as the library board may adopt to render such library of the greatest use to the inhabitants of the city, village, county, or township. The board may exclude from the use of the library and reading rooms any person who willfully violates or refuses to comply with rules and regulations established for the government thereof.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 7, p. 316;

R.S.1913, § 3798;

C.S.1922, § 3191;

C.S.1929, § 51-207;

R.S.1943, § 51-212;

Laws 1990, LB 1236, § 3.